src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
аквщӣрыл-пинтлуӈкве:аквщӣрыл-пинтл V33_odd "уложить /что-л в определённом порядке/" ;
ва̄нттуӈкве:ва̄нтт V33_odd "приводить /куда-л/" ;
ва̄ӈклуӈкве:ва̄ӈкл V33_odd "запинаться" ;
ёл-ва̄нттуӈкве:ёл-ва̄нтт V33_odd "свести /вниз/" ;
ёл-ӯнттуӈкве:ёл-ӯнтт V33_odd "усадить" ;
ёт-ва̄нттуӈкве:ёт-ва̄нтт V33_odd "увести" ;
ёт-харттуӈкве:ёт-хартт V33_odd "утащить /унести/" ;
кантлуӈкве:кантл V33_odd "сердиться" ;
ква̄лттуӈкве:ква̄лтт V33_odd "будить" ;
кон-ква̄лттуӈкве:кон-ква̄лтт V33_odd "вынести " ;
кон-па̄хвтуӈкве:кон-па̄хвт V33_odd "выбрасывать " ;
ла̄кква-па̄хвтуӈкве:ла̄кква-па̄хвт V33_odd "разбросать" ;
ла̄кква-ӯнттуӈкве:ла̄кква-ӯнтт V33_odd "расставить" ;
лап-па̄хвтуӈкве:лап-па̄хвт V33_odd "накидать" ;
ля̄льт-па̄хвтуӈкве:ля̄льт-па̄хвт V33_odd "забросать" ;
на̄лув-ӯнттуӈкве:на̄лув-ӯнтт V33_odd "поставить /к костру//к берегу/" ;
но̄х-ква̄лттуӈкве:но̄х-ква̄лтт V33_odd "поднять /после сна/" ;
па̄ӈктуӈкве:па̄ӈкт V33_odd "загрязнить" ;
пахвтуӈкве:пахвт V33_odd "кидать" ;
па̄хвтуӈкве:па̄хвт V33_odd "метать /бросать/" ;
сартлуӈкве:сартл V33_odd "тереть" ;
сӯлттуӈкве:сӯлтт V33_odd "нестись /скакать на лошади/" ;
та̄лттуӈкве:та̄лтт V33_odd "посадить /людей во что-л//на что-л/" ;
ӯнттуӈкве:ӯнтт V33_odd "поставить /поместить что-л подо что-л/" ;
хо̄нтлуӈкве:хо̄нтл V33_odd "воевать " ;
хот-па̄хвтуӈкве:хот-па̄хвт V33_odd "сбрасывать" ;
хунтлуӈкве:хунтл V33_odd "слушаться" ;
астлаӈкве:астла V33_odd "завершить" ;
а̄стлаӈкве:а̄стла V33_odd "приготовить" ;
ва̄нттаӈкве:ва̄нтта V33_odd "привести /куда-л/" ;
ва̄тлтаӈкве:ва̄тлта V33_odd "позволить//допустить//просить /собирать ягоды/" ;
ёл-торлтаӈкве:ёл-торлта V33_odd "уронить" ;
ла̄кква-нюнслаӈкве:ла̄кква-нюнсла V33_odd "растянуть" ;
лап-сартлаӈкве:лап-сартла V33_odd "обмазывать" ;
ню̄нслаӈкве:ню̄нсла V33_odd "тянуть" ;
па̄г-а̄лмтаӈкве:па̄г-а̄лмта V33_odd "тащить /от берега/" ;
паӈктаӈкве:паӈкта V33_odd "пачкать" ;
пе̄рмтаӈкве:пе̄рмта V33_odd "обернуть /обмотать вокруг чего-л/" ;
пинтлаӈкве:пинтла V33_odd "вкладывать " ;
понслаӈкве:понсла V33_odd "коптить /мясо//рыбу/" ;
порслаӈкве:порсла V33_odd "уничтожить" ;
са̄ӈлтаӈкве:са̄ӈлта V33_odd "бренчать " ;
тытлтаӈкве:тытлта V33_odd "намочить" ;
харттаӈкве:хартта V33_odd "протащить /тащить/" ;
юв-ва̄нттаӈкве:юв-ва̄нтта V33_odd "ввести " ;
